Washington statutes.
RCW 3.66.080

Criminal venue corrected.

If a criminal action is commenced in an improper district under RCW 3.66.070, the court may of its own volition or at the request of either party order the case removed for trial to a proper district.

[ 1984 c 258 s 48; 1961 c 299 s 119.]

NOTES:

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.